Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 23 Judicial Review of Probate Court Orders and Decisions

33-23-1.
Filing of claim of appeal, record, and reasons.

Any person aggrieved by an order or decree of a probate court (hereinafter “appellant”), may, unless provisions be made to the contrary, appeal to the superior court for the county in which the probate court is established by taking the following procedure:

Within twenty (20) days after execution of the order or decree by the probate judge, the appellant shall file, in the office of the clerk of the probate court, a claim of appeal to the superior court and a request for a certified copy of the claim and shall pay the clerk his or her fees therefor.

Within thirty (30) days after the entry of the order or decree, the appellant shall file, in the superior court, a certified copy of the claim and the reasons of appeal specifically stated, to which reasons the appellant shall be restricted, unless, for cause shown, and with or without terms, the superior court shall allow amendments and additions thereto.

The appellant shall file with the probate clerk an affidavit in proof of the filing and docketing of the probate appeal pursuant to the time deadlines set forth in subdivision (a)(2).

An appeal under this chapter is not an appeal on error but is to be heard de novo in the superior court. The record of proceedings, including the certified documents and the transcript (if any) from the probate proceedings, may be introduced in the superior court without further authentication. The findings of fact and/or decisions of the probate court may be given as much weight and deference as the superior court deems appropriate, however, the superior court shall not be bound by any such findings or decisions. Nothing herein shall preclude a witness who testified at the probate court proceeding from testifying at the superior court hearing, however, the transcript of such probate court testimony may be used for any evidentiary purpose, consistent with the Rhode Island rules of evidence.

The deadline of subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) are jurisdictional and may not be extended by either the probate court or the superior court.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude interested parties in a probate proceeding from stipulating to a probate appeal from the probate court to the superior court and, toward that end, to build a record by agreed statement of facts and otherwise; to fashion on a form of order or decree to preserve or frame issues as the parties desire; and to preserve the status quo ante pending appeal through custodianship of assets or otherwise. Such a stipulated probate appeal shall be governed by, and be subject to, the procedural requirements of this chapter.

The executor, administrator, guardian, or other fiduciary, pending a probate appeal, shall annually, or more often as requested by the probate court, file a written report of the status of the appeal.

The filing fees payable to the superior court clerk for reasons of appeal in a probate appeal shall be the same as those established from time to time for the filing of a complaint in a civil action.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 796; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-1

; P.L. 1975, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 550, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 485, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 495, § 1.

33-23-2.
Suspension of order or decree pending appeal.

If an appeal is claimed from an order or decree of a probate court, the operation of the order or decree shall be suspended, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, until the appeal is dismissed or discontinued, or the order or decree shall be finally affirmed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 806; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-2

; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 2.

33-23-3.
Effect of appeal from granting of letters.

If an appeal is claimed from a decree of a probate court granting letters testamentary, of administration, of administration with the will annexed, or of guardianship, the executor, administrator, administrator with the will annexed, or guardian, on giving bond as by law required, file an inventory and collect, receive, and take possession of all the rights, credits, and estates of the testator, intestate, or ward, as if no appeal had been claimed. All claims against the estate of the deceased or ward shall be filed within the time prescribed by law, and the executor, administrator, or guardian may, under the direction of the probate court, do such acts as the law requires concerning claims; and all limitations in regard to claims shall apply as if no appeal had been claimed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 807; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-3

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 2.

33-23-4.
Sale of tangible personal property pending appeal.

In case of an appeal from an order or decree of a probate court granting letters testamentary, of administration, of administration with the will annexed or of guardianship, the executor, administrator, administrator with the will annexed, or guardian, pending the appeal, upon leave of the probate court first obtained, may sell at public auction or private sale any tangible personal property of the testator, intestate, or ward, which are liable to perish or waste or to be greatly reduced in value by keeping, or which cannot be kept without great and disproportionate expense, and hold the proceeds of those sales, after deducting from the proceeds the necessary expenses of sale, for the benefit of the estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 808; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-4

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13.

33-23-5.
Sale of personalty in general pending appeal.

In case of an appeal taken from an order or decree of a probate court granting letters testamentary, of administration, of administration with the will annexed, or of guardianship, the executor, administrator, administrator with the will annexed, or guardian, having given bond according to law, the court shall, pending the appeal and until the order or decree is finally affirmed or disaffirmed, have power to authorize the executor, administrator, administrator with the will annexed, or guardian to sell the personal estate of the deceased person or ward, as the case may be, according to such terms and conditions as the court may require or impose, pending the appeal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 20; P.L. 1931, ch. 1723, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1923, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-5

.

33-23-6.
Powers over real estate pending appeal.

In case of an appeal taken from an order or decree of a probate court granting letters testamentary, of administration, of administration with the will annexed, or of guardianship, the executor, administrator, or administrator with the will annexed, or guardian, having given bond according to law, shall, pending the appeal and until the order or decree is finally affirmed or disaffirmed, have power to collect, sue for, and hold the income and rents of the real and personal estate of the testator or ward for the benefit of the persons entitled to the real estate, and the executor, administrator, administrator with the will annexed, or guardian, may bring suit in his or her name for the possession of any real or personal estate, pending the appeal, and shall have the power, under the direction of the probate court, to pay any debts of the testator, intestate, or ward, and the probate court may authorize the executor, administrator, administrator with the will annexed, or guardian to sell real estate, or any interest therein, of the deceased person or ward, as the case may be, subject to the conditions, according to the practice, and in the manner provided by chapter 19 of this title.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 809; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 14; P.L. 1931, ch. 1771, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-6

.

33-23-7.
Transfer of estate pending appeal from decree removing fiduciary.

A decree of a probate court removing an executor, administrator or guardian shall have effect, notwithstanding an appeal, until otherwise finally determined on appeal. The probate court may in this case appoint a successor to the person removed, to whom, when qualified, the person removed shall promptly deliver all the property held by him or her as executor, administrator, or guardian, and the successor shall proceed in the performance of his or her duties in like manner as if no appeal had been taken. But if the decree or removal is reversed by final decree, the powers of the successor shall cease, and he or she shall promptly deliver to his or her predecessor in the trust, or to such person as the court may order, all property of the estate in his or her possession.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 810; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-7

.

33-23-8.
Notice of appeal.

When a probate appeal is entered in the superior court, the appellant shall serve a true copy of the reasons of appeal by regular mail, postage prepaid, to all interested persons in the estate of the deceased or ward and to all persons who entered an appearance, pro se or through counsel, in the underlying probate proceedings. The appellant shall further notify such persons that they have the right to enter an appearance or move to intervene in the superior court probate appeal within twenty (20) days after service. The appellant shall file a certificate in the superior court that notice was given in the manner prescribed in this section and shall identify the names and addresses of the persons to whom notice was given. If an interested person fails to enter an appearance or move to intervene within twenty (20) days after notice, the superior court may entertain the appellant’s probate appeal without further notice to such person.

The superior court may, sua sponte or on the motion of any interested party, order notice of the probate appeal advertised in a newspaper of general circulation in this state upon such terms and conditions as the court may direct.

The superior court may at any time during the pendency of a probate appeal direct any additional notice or service.

Any interested person in the estate of a deceased or ward may enter an appearance in the probate court or superior court and, upon doing so, is entitled to copies, at his or her own expense, of any and all filings in the estate by any party.

The superior court may, upon motion, permit any interested person to intervene in a probate appeal and, upon doing so, is entitled to participate in any and all superior court proceedings concerning the appeal. The executor, administrator, guardian or other fiduciary shall automatically be a party to the superior court proceedings without motion to intervene.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 797; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 2; P.L. 1909, ch. 427, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-8

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13.

33-23-9.
Assignment day.

The probate appeal may be assigned to the formal and special cause calendar, the continuous non-jury trial calendar, or the continuous jury trial calendar, as the case may be, which occurs not less than seventy-five (75) days from the date that the probate order or decree appealed was executed by the probate judge.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 798; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-9

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13; P.L. 2004, ch. 573, § 3.

33-23-10.
Assignment for hearing.

The appellant may, in the reasons of appeal, claim a trial by jury of any factual dispute or issue raised in his or her reasons of appeal. Any interested person may, within twenty (20) days after service of notice of the probate appeal, claim a trial by jury of any factual dispute raised in the appeal.

If the probate appeal raises a genuine issue of material fact, upon motion of the appellant or any party to the proceedings pursuant to §

33-23-8(e)

, the matter shall be assigned to the continuous non-jury trial calendar or jury trial calendar, as claimed pursuant to §

33-23-10(a)

.

If the probate appeal can be decided as a matter of law, upon motion of the appellant or any party to the proceedings pursuant to §

33-23-8(e)

, the matter shall be assigned to the formal and special cause calendar where a briefing schedule shall be established and the matter further assigned to a justice of the superior court for decision based upon the record and the briefs submitted. The justice assigned may request or permit oral argument.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 799; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-10

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13.

33-23-11.
Failure to file appeal claimed.

If the appellant fails to file his or her reasons of appeal in the superior court within the time allowed by §

33-23-1(a)(2)

, the probate court from which the appeal was taken shall, upon petition of any person interested, and upon such notice to the appellant as the court shall order, affirm the order or decree appealed from and further proceed as if no claim of appeal had been filed; and in that case the probate court may award double costs against the appellant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 800; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-11

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 2.

33-23-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 801; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-12

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13; P.L. 2004, ch. 573, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 158, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 257, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 314, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; P.L. 2014, ch. 550, § 2, effective July 8, 2014.

33-23-13.
Discontinuance of appeal.

The party taking an appeal from an order or decree of a probate court may, at any time, discontinue the appeal in the manner provided for the discontinuance of proceedings in the superior court; and upon presentation to the probate court of a certificate of the discontinuance from the clerk of the superior court having jurisdiction of the appeal, the appeal shall then be entered on the record of the probate court as discontinued; and the suspension of the operation of the order or decree appealed from, provided in §

33-23-2

, shall then cease, and the original order or decree shall then take effect as if an appeal had not been taken.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 802; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-13

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13.

33-23-14.
Modification of decrees after discontinuance of appeal.

In case an appeal shall have been taken from a decree granting letters testamentary, or of administration with the will annexed, or of administration, or of guardianship, any order or decree of the probate court made previous to discontinuance of the appeal, prescribing the amount and nature of bonds to be given by the executor, administrator, or guardian, may, after discontinuance, be modified or vacated, and new orders and decrees may be substituted if necessary, and bonds given accordingly; and in case of the modification or vacation of any such former orders or decrees, the bond or bonds given thereunder may be cancelled and discharged by the probate court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 811; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-14

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13.

33-23-15.
Want of jurisdiction — Amendments to supply defects.

No order or decree of a probate court which may be appealed from, or in any collateral proceeding when the same shall not have been appealed from, shall be deemed to be invalid, or be quashed, for want of proper form, or for want of jurisdiction appearing upon the record, if the probate court had jurisdiction of the subject matter of the order or decree. The superior court having jurisdiction of the parties to a probate appeal may allow amendments to be made in the papers filed in the case, to supply any deficiency or correct errors therein, upon such terms as it may deem proper.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 803; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-15

.

33-23-16.
Correction of want of notice.

Whenever it shall appear in any probate proceeding that any person interested in the probate proceeding has not been duly notified, the jurisdiction of the court where the proceeding is pending shall not be defeated thereby, but the court may order notice to be given to that person. The notice shall be served not less than fourteen (14) days before the return day, and after the service and return thereof all orders and proceedings of the court shall be effective in binding the person named in the notice.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 804; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-16

.

33-23-17.
Consolidation of appeals — Addition of parties.

Whenever there shall be more than one probate appeal in the superior court, relating to substantially the same matter, the superior court may by special order provide for the consolidation of the appeals, for admitting or summoning in other parties, and for giving notice or further notice to parties in interest.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 805; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-17

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13.

33-23-18.
Affirmance, reversal, or entry of new decree.

The superior court may, upon appeal, affirm or reverse, in whole or in part, any order or decree of a probate court, and may enter such decrees as the probate court ought to have entered and may remand the case for further proceedings, with or without instructions, to the probate court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 812; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-18

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13.

33-23-19.
Transmission of final decree to probate court.

A copy of the final judgment entered by the superior court, in any probate appeal under the provisions of this chapter, shall be certified and transmitted by the clerk of the superior court, without fee therefor, to the probate court appealed from.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 813; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-19

; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 13.

33-23-20.
Conclusiveness of advice or direction of probate court.

In all cases where an executor, administrator, or guardian is directed by law to obtain the advice and direction of the probate court before acting, there shall be no appeal from that advice or direction; and the advice and direction shall be conclusive, and all parties acting on the advice and direction shall be protected thereunder.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 814; G.L. 1909, ch. 311, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 362, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 573, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

33-23-20

.